Louisiana, session 2026, HB1184.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 17:351.1(F), Subpart A of Part I of Chapter 4 of Title 17 of the
Louisiana Revised Statutes of 1950, comprised of R.S. 17:1421, and 3393(A)(2)(d)(iii) are
hereby enacted to read as follows:
§351.1. Textbooks and other instructional materials; review; adoption; procurement;
distribution
* * *
F.(1) Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, on and after July
1, 2027, no contract that procures artificial intelligence technology, software, or
products or includes products or services utilizing artificial intelligence technology,
software, or products shall be executed unless the vendor provides an affidavit
Page 1 of 9
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-2506 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 1184
signed by an authorized representative attesting that the vendor meets all of the
following criteria:
(a) The vendor is not owned by a foreign country of concern.
(b) No foreign country of concern has a controlling interest in the vendor.
(c) The vendor is not organized under the laws of a foreign country of
concern.
(d) The vendor does not have its principal place of business in a foreign
country of concern.
(2) For the purposes of this Subsection, the following terms shall have the
following meanings, unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:
(a) "Artificial intelligence" means a machine-based system that can, for a
given set of human-defined objectives, make predictions, recommendations, or
decisions influencing real or virtual environments.
(b) "Foreign country of concern" means the People's Republic of China, the
Russian Federation, the Islamic Republic of Iran, the Democratic People's Republic
of Korea, or the Republic of Cuba. The term shall include any agency of one of
these countries and any entity under the control of one of these countries.
* * *
SUBPART A. GENERAL PROVISIONS
§1421. Higher Education Procurement Code; prohibitions
A. As used in this Section, the following terms shall have the following
meanings, unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:
(1) "Artificial intelligence" means a machine-based system that can, for a
given set of human-defined objectives, make predictions, recommendations, or
decisions influencing real or virtual environments.
(2) "Foreign country of concern" means the People's Republic of China, the
Russian Federation, the Islamic Republic of Iran, the Democratic People's Republic
of Korea, or the Republic of Cuba. The term shall include any agency of one of
these countries and any entity under the control of one of these countries.
Page 2 of 9
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-2506 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 1184
B. Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, on and after July
1, 2027, neither the Board of Supervisors of Louisiana State University and
Agricultural and Mechanical College nor any institution or program it administers
shall enter into or extend a contract that procures artificial intelligence technology,
software, or products or includes products or services utilizing artificial intelligence
technology, software, or products unless the vendor provides an affidavit signed by
an authorized representative attesting that the vendor meets all of the following
criteria:
(1) The vendor is not owned by a foreign country of concern.
(2) No foreign country of concern has a controlling interest in the vendor.
(3) The vendor is not organized under the laws of a foreign country of
concern.
(4) The vendor does not have its principal place of business in a foreign
country of concern.
* * *
§3393. Operational autonomy contingent on audit findings
A.
* * *
(2)
* * *
(d)
* * *
(iii)(aa) Notwithstanding any provision of law or the higher education
procurement code to the contrary, on and after July 1, 2027, no contract that procures
artificial intelligence technology, software, or products or includes products or
services utilizing artificial intelligence technology, software, or products shall be
executed unless the vendor provides an affidavit signed by an authorized
representative attesting that the vendor meets all of the following criteria:
(I) The vendor is not owned by a foreign country of concern.
Page 3 of 9
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-2506 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 1184
(II) No foreign country of concern has a controlling interest in the vendor.
(III) The vendor is not organized under the laws of a foreign country of
concern.
(IV) The vendor does not have its principal place of business in a foreign
country of concern.
(bb) For the purposes of this Item, the following terms shall have the
following meanings, unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:
(I) "Artificial intelligence" means a machine-based system that can, for a
given set of human-defined objectives, make predictions, recommendations, or
decisions influencing real or virtual environments.
(II) "Foreign country of concern" means the People's Republic of China, the
Russian Federation, the Islamic Republic of Iran, the Democratic People's Republic
of Korea, or the Republic of Cuba. The term shall include any agency of one of
these countries and any entity under the control of one of these countries.
* * *
Section 2. R.S. 24:38.1 is hereby enacted to read as follows:
§38.1. Artificial intelligence; prohibited contracts with foreign countries of concern
A. As used in this Section, the following terms shall have the following
meanings, unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:
(1) "Artificial intelligence" means a machine-based system that can, for a
given set of human-defined objectives, make predictions, recommendations, or
decisions influencing real or virtual environments.
(2) "Foreign country of concern" means the People's Republic of China, the
Russian Federation, the Islamic Republic of Iran, the Democratic People's Republic
of Korea, or the Republic of Cuba. The term shall include any agency of one of
these countries and any entity under the control of one of these countries.
B. On and after July 1, 2027, no agency or entity in the legislative branch
shall enter into or extend a contract that procures artificial intelligence technology,
software, or products or includes products or services utilizing artificial intelligence
Page 4 of 9
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-2506 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 1184
technology, software, or products unless the vendor provides an affidavit signed by
an authorized representative attesting that the vendor meets all of the following
criteria:
(1) The vendor is not owned by a foreign country of concern.
(2) No foreign country of concern has a controlling interest in the vendor.
(3) The vendor is not organized under the laws of a foreign country of
concern.
(4) The vendor does not have its principal place of business in a foreign
country of concern.
Section 3. R.S. 38:2216.2 is hereby enacted to read as follows:
§2216.2. Artificial intelligence; prohibited contracts with foreign countries of
concern
A. As used in this Section, the following terms shall have the following
meanings, unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:
(1) "Artificial intelligence" means a machine-based system that can, for a
given set of human-defined objectives, make predictions, recommendations, or
decisions influencing real or virtual environments.
(2) "Foreign country of concern" means the People's Republic of China, the
Russian Federation, the Islamic Republic of Iran, the Democratic People's Republic
of Korea, or the Republic of Cuba. The term shall include any agency of one of
these countries and any entity under the control of one of these countries.
B. On and after July 1, 2027, a public entity shall not enter into or extend a
contract for artificial intelligence technology, software, or products or includes
products or services utilizing artificial intelligence technology, software, or products
unless the contractor provides an affidavit signed by an authorized representative
attesting that the contractor meets all of the following criteria:
(1) The contractor is not owned by a foreign country of concern.
(2) No foreign country of concern has a controlling interest in the contractor.
Page 5 of 9
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-2506 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 1184
(3) The contractor is not organized under the laws of a foreign country of
concern.
(4) The contractor does not have its principal place of business in a foreign
country of concern.
Section 4. R.S. 39:199.1 is hereby amended and reenacted and R.S. 39:200.1 and
1602.3 are hereby enacted to read as follows:
§199.1. Alternative procedures
A. Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, and except as
provided in Subsection B of this Section, an agency shall not be required to follow
the procedures provided in this Part or the Louisiana Procurement Code for
procurement of software and the hardware used to support the software if the
alternative procedures to be used by the agency are approved by the Joint Legislative
Committee on Technology and Cybersecurity and the specific procurement is
approved by the Joint Legislative Committee on the Budget.
B. The provisions of R.S. 39:1602.3 shall apply to any procurement executed
pursuant to the provisions of this Section.
* * *
§200.1. Artificial intelligence; prohibited contracts with foreign countries of
concern
The provisions of R.S. 39:1602.3 shall apply to any procurement executed
pursuant to the provisions of this Part.
* * *
§1602.3. Artificial intelligence; prohibited contracts with foreign countries of
concern
A. As used in this Section, the following terms shall have the following
meanings, unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:
(1) "Artificial intelligence" means a machine-based system that can, for a
given set of human-defined objectives, make predictions, recommendations, or
decisions influencing real or virtual environments.
Page 6 of 9
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-2506 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 1184
(2) "Foreign country of concern" means the People's Republic of China, the
Russian Federation, the Islamic Republic of Iran, the Democratic People's Republic
of Korea, or the Republic of Cuba. The term shall include any agency of one of
these countries and any entity under the control of one of these countries.
B. On and after July 1, 2027, no governmental body or governmental entity
shall procure artificial intelligence technology, software, or products or supplies or
services that utilize artificial intelligence technology, software, or products unless
the vendor provides an affidavit signed by an authorized representative attesting that
the vendor meets all of the following criteria:
(1) The vendor is not owned by a foreign country of concern.
(2) No foreign country of concern has a controlling interest in the vendor.
(3) The vendor is not organized under the laws of a foreign country of
concern.
(4) The vendor does not have its principal place of business in a foreign
country of concern.
Section 5. The provisions of this Section shall become effective July 1, 2027.